Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-609
Right-of-way; vegetation; treatment; charge by county; collection.

If any railroad neglects or refuses to cause its right-of-way to be mowed, sprayed, or otherwise treated as provided in section 74-608, the county board or board of supervisors in which county the right-of-way is located shall, after the time in which the railroad is required to act, cause the vegetation on the railroad right-of-way to be mowed, sprayed, or otherwise treated and the county may charge the railroad the reasonable cost thereof. The county clerk shall include such amounts in making the county tax list as an assessment against such railroad, and the assessment shall be collected in the same manner and at the same time as other taxes.

Laws 1897, c. 17, § 2, p. 183;

Laws 1909, c. 99, § 1, p. 407;

R.S.1913, § 6041;

Laws 1915, c. 105, § 1, p. 251;

C.S.1922, § 5402;

Laws 1925, c. 162, § 1, p. 424;

C.S.1929, § 74-607;

R.S.1943, § 74-609;

Laws 1959, c. 337, § 2, p. 1220;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 19.